Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
ARTICLE 10 PARKS - GENERAL PROVISIONS
33-10-111. Parks and outdoor recreation cash fund - parks for future generations trust fund - creation - fees - accounting expenditures for roads and highways - definition - repeal.

Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section and sections 33-10.5-104.5, 33-10.5-105, 33-14-106, 33-14.5-106, and 33-15-103, all money derived pursuant to articles 10 to 15 of this title 33 from division facilities and fees, and all interest earned on the money, shall be credited to the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund, which is hereby created, together with all money donated, transferred, or appropriated from whatever source for the use of the division in administering, managing, and supervising the state parks and outdoor recreation system and in the financing of impact assistance grants pursuant to part 3 of article 25 of title 30. All cash receipts from state-owned desert, saline, and internal improvement lands shall be credited to the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund.

(1.5) (a) Within three days after June 21, 2021, the state treasurer shall transfer seventeen million five hundred thousand dollars from the general fund to the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund for use by the division. The division shall use:

Three million five hundred thousand dollars of the transferred money for staffing and maintenance projects to manage increased visitation to state parks and the resultant impacts on trails and other recreational amenities; and

Fourteen million dollars of the transferred money for infrastructure and state park development projects, including:

Investment in campgrounds, trails, roads, restrooms, and other facilities;

Any project planning or cultural or natural resources studies as necessary to complete the projects; and

Any necessary expenses to allow for the use of properties that the division holds for state parks purposes.

This subsection (1.5) is repealed, effective September 1, 2024.

The director, with the consent and approval of the executive director, is authorized and directed to establish an adequate system of accounting which will accurately record:

All moneys received and from what sources;

All moneys expended and for what purposes;

All passes, permits, and registrations that are issued, numbering each type separately.

In his annual budget request to the governor, the executive director shall clearly show the allocation of funds used for parks and outdoor recreation purposes among operations, land acquisition, capital construction, and other purposes.

At each regular session, the general assembly shall determine the amounts to be expended by the division for the acquisition of rights-of-way for the construction, improvement, repair, and maintenance of public roads and highways in state recreation areas and parks and shall appropriate such amounts from the state allocation provided by section 43-4-206, C.R.S., from the highway users tax fund to the division as are necessary to accomplish these purposes.

Repealed.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the parks for future generations trust fund. The fund consists of moneys appropriated to the fund by the general assembly, moneys received from energy or mineral royalties or leases of energy or mineral rights on park properties, and gifts, grants, and donations.

For purposes of this subparagraph (I), "park properties" means each state park and state recreation area and any other park properties in which the division owns mineral interests.

The fund is under the control of and administered by the commission. The controller shall authorize disbursements from the fund as directed by the commission on receipt of a voucher from the commission stating that the disbursement is in accordance with this subsection (6).

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the commission shall submit an annual report of the money expended from the fund and matters accomplished by the expenditures from the preceding fiscal year to the senate agriculture, natural resources, and energy committee and the house of representatives agriculture, livestock, and natural resources committee, or their successor committees, by the convening date of each regular session of the general assembly in accordance with section 24-1-136 (9). The commission shall also submit to these committees a report on money proposed to be expended from the fund and the matters to be accomplished by the expenditures in the upcoming fiscal year.

All moneys and interest in the fund remain in the fund to be used for the purposes set forth in this subsection (6) and shall not be deposited in or transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 887, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 91:

(4) amended, p. 1071, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended and (5) added, p. 778, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2000:

(5)(b)(III) amended and (5)(b)(IV) added, p. 1598, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2003:

(5)(a) amended, (5)(b)(III) and (5)(b)(IV) repealed, and (5)(c) added, pp. 1528, 1529, §§ 1, 3, effective May 1; (4) amended, p. 1943, § 10, effective May 22.

L. 2007:

(5)(c) amended, p. 700, § 1, effective May 3.

L. 2012:

IP(5)(a), (5)(a)(I), (5)(b)(I), (5)(b)(II), and (5)(c) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1218, § 36, effective June 4.

L. 2015:

(1) amended and (6) added, (HB 15-1243), ch. 167, p. 512, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(6)(c) amended, (HB 17-1257), ch. 254, p. 1065, § 6, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1008), ch. 137, p. 895, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(1.5) added, (HB 21-1326), ch. 274, p. 1593, § 5, effective June 21.

33-10-111.5. Parks and outdoor recreation emergency reserve cash fund - stores revolving fund - created.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the parks and outdoor recreation emergency reserve cash fund. Moneys in an amount as specified in subsection (2) of this section from the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund created in section 33-10-111 that are not otherwise expended pursuant to that section shall be credited to the parks and outdoor recreation emergency reserve cash fund. Such fund shall be available to be used if there are insufficient funds in the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund at the end of any fiscal year for appropriations affecting the division made in that fiscal year.

For the fiscal year 2008 and for each fiscal year thereafter, the balance in the parks and outdoor recreation emergency reserve cash fund shall increase by one percent of the overall appropriation to the division of parks and wildlife for state park operations; except that the balance in the parks and outdoor recreation emergency reserve cash fund shall not exceed ten percent of the total amount appropriated for state park operations.

The parks and outdoor recreation cash fund shall not be unreasonably used to offset any general fund restriction or reduction that is imposed on the department of natural resources.

There is hereby created a stores revolving fund, which fund shall be maintained to acquire stock for warehousing and distributing supplies for retail sales to visitors. The money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the division for the purchase of stock for retail sales to visitors. The purpose of the fund is to provide better budgetary control. Nothing contained in this subsection (4) authorizes the division to make any purchases or acquisitions in any manner except as provided by law. Any surplus in the revolving fund in excess of the amount needed for stock purchases may be reverted, as appropriate, to any other cash fund administered by the division.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 1351, § 4, effective May 26.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 1977, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(4) added, p. 1529, § 4, effective May 1.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 700, § 2, effective May 3.

L. 2015:

(2) and (4) amended, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 964, § 83, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

(4) amended, (SB 18-143), ch. 207, p. 1336, § 13, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (SB 21-249), ch. 273, p. 1590, § 8, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Hunting, Fishing, and Parks for Future Generations Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 18-143, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 207, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

33-10-112. Federal aid projects income fund.

There is hereby created a fund designated as the federal aid projects income fund to which shall be credited certain revenues and earnings derived from properties purchased and operated jointly by the United States government and the state of Colorado under the provisions of this article, and the provisions of the acts of congress referred to therein, and the rules and regulations of the United States department of the interior. Such revenues and earnings so credited shall be limited to those specific revenues and earnings to which each has a right under the provisions of cooperative agreements establishing such rights. All moneys credited under the provisions of this section are specifically appropriated for the purposes for which such moneys may accrue.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 887, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

33-10-113. Designation of agency.

The division is authorized to accept and administer funds provided for the planning and development of the outdoor recreation resources of this state pursuant to the provisions of the act of congress entitled the "Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965", as amended. In connection with obtaining for the state of Colorado the benefits of any such programs, the division shall coordinate its activities with and represent the interest of all agencies of the state and of counties, cities, and other local governments having an interest in the planning, development, and maintenance of outdoor recreation resources within the state.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 888, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

Cross references:

For the "Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965", see Pub.L. 88-578.

33-10-114. Limitation on division and commission authority.

Neither the commission nor the division shall enter into any mitigation agreements with any agency of the federal government relating to the transfer or exchange of land or water condemned by the federal government without the express consent of the general assembly.

Nothing in subsection (1) of this section prevents the commission or the division from entering into common agreements with a federal agency pertaining to the administration or management of federally owned lands.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 888, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1219, § 37, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-30-107.5 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-10-115. Use of parks and recreational areas by nonprofit backcountry search and rescue organizations - definitions - rules.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Backcountry Search and Rescue State Parks Usage Act".

As used in this section:

"Backcountry search and rescue activities" means official drills, exercises, live incidents, or other such activities that provide instruction to backcountry search and rescue personnel, and that are conducted at any time of the day, including, without limitation, overnight or over several days and nights.

"Park, recreation area, or facility" means:

A state park;

A state recreation area; or

A state-owned facility that is open to the public and related to or adjoining a state park or a state recreation area.

"Public or nonprofit backcountry search and rescue organization" means a not-for-profit entity that performs backcountry search and rescue, disaster relief, or national defense missions in Colorado. The term includes, without limitation, the Colorado civil air patrol, governmental search and rescue organizations, and the Colorado search and rescue association.

A public or nonprofit backcountry search and rescue organization shall be exempt from all park fees when the organization is using a park, recreation area, or facility to conduct backcountry search and rescue activities.

The commission may promulgate rules as are reasonably necessary to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-182), ch. 148, p. 616, § 2, effective April 20.

L. 2012:

(4) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1219, § 38, effective June 4.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-245), ch. 358, p. 2338, § 6, effective June 27.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-245, see section 1 of chapter 358, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

33-10-116. Backcountry search and rescue - study - training and physical and psychological support pilot program.

The division shall conduct a study and develop recommendations on how to address the challenges associated with backcountry search and rescue in the state. At a minimum, the study must address:

How to improve and develop a sustainable structure for coordination among the state of Colorado, county sheriffs and local law enforcement agencies, public or nonprofit organizations that provide backcountry search and rescue services, and federal agencies;

The availability and adequacy of workers' compensation or other benefits for individuals who are injured in the course of providing backcountry search and rescue services, including as volunteers;

The availability and adequacy of retirement benefits for individuals who provide backcountry search and rescue services, including as volunteers;

Compensation and reimbursement of expenses for volunteers who provide backcountry search and rescue services;

The availability of necessary equipment and the need for funding to obtain, maintain, and replace equipment and operate backcountry search and rescue teams;

The physical and psychological impacts of providing backcountry search and rescue and the availability and adequacy of physical and psychological support and resources for individuals who provide backcountry search and rescue services, including as volunteers;

Issues related to governmental immunity for volunteers who provide backcountry search and rescue services;

Training needs for volunteers involved in backcountry search and rescue; and

The need for public outdoor safety education.

In conducting the study required by this subsection (1), the division shall consult with affected stakeholders, including county sheriffs, public and nonprofit backcountry search and rescue organizations, the department of public safety, the department of local affairs, the Colorado avalanche information center, local governments, and other entities affected by or involved with backcountry search and rescue.

The department shall report on the division's findings as part of the department's "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203 in January 2022 to the rural affairs and agriculture committee of the house of representatives and the agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate, or their successor committees.

The division shall conduct outreach and training across the state on physical and psychological stress injuries and impacts faced by backcountry search and rescue volunteers. The outreach and training may include working with a qualified consultant to assess the physical and psychological needs of volunteers and provide training on recognizing and addressing those needs, developing a grant program for local government agencies or backcountry search and rescue organizations to provide physical and psychological support and training to volunteers, or developing other outreach, training, and services for backcountry search and rescue volunteers across the state.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-245), ch. 358, p. 2335, § 3, effective June 27.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-245, see section 1 of chapter 358, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.